fi: Hevosen hoidon tarkoitus: Rauhoittaminen ja käytös; Karvapeitteen hoito; Viilennys ja kylmähoito; Ruoansulatuksen tuki; Kärpästen ja hyönteisten torjunta; Kavioiden hoito; Nivelten ja liikkuvuuden tuki; Hengitysteiden tuki; Ihon- ja haavanhoito; Aurinkovoide ja UV-suoja; Muu
pl: Cel pielęgnacji konia: Uspokojenie i zachowanie; Sierść i pielęgnacja; Terapia chłodząca; Wsparcie trawienia; Ochrona przed owadami; Pielęgnacja kopyt; Wsparcie stawów i mobilności; Wsparcie układu oddechowego; Pielęgnacja skóry i ran; Ochrona przeciwsłoneczna i UV; Inny
es: Propósito del cuidado del caballo: Calmante y comportamiento; Pelaje y aseo; Terapia de frío y hielo; Apoyo digestivo; Control de moscas e insectos; Cuidado de los cascos; Apoyo para las articulaciones y la movilidad; Apoyo respiratorio; Cuidado de la piel y de las heridas; Protector solar y protección UV; Otro
sl-SI: Namen nege konj: Pomiritev in obnašanje; Dlaka in nega; Terapija s hlajenjem in ledom; Podpora prebavi; Zaščita pred muhami in žuželkami; Nega kopit; Podpora za sklepe in gibljivost; Podpora dihalom; Nega kože in ran; Zaščita pred soncem in UV-žarki; Drugo
en: Horse care purpose: Calming & behavior; Coat & grooming; Cooling & icing therapy; Digestive support; Fly & insect control; Hoof care; Joint & mobility support; Respiratory support; Skin & wound care; Sunscreen & UV protection; Other
it: Scopo di cura dei cavalli: Calmanti e comportamento; Mantello e toelettatura; Terapia del freddo; Supporto digestivo; Controllo mosche e insetti; Cura degli zoccoli; Supporto articolare e mobilità; Supporto respiratorio; Cura della pelle e delle ferite; Protezione solare e UV; Altro
sv: Syfte med hästvård: Lugnande och beteende; Päls och rykt; Kyl- och isbehandling; Matsmältningsstöd; Flug- och insektsmedel; Hovvård; Led- och rörlighetsstöd; Stöd för luftvägarna; Hud- och sårvård; Solskydd och UV-skydd; Annat
hu: Lógondozási cél: Nyugtatás és viselkedés; Szőrápolás; Hűtő és jeges terápia; Emésztést támogató; Légy- és rovarirtó; Pataápolás; Ízület- és mozgástámogató; Légzéstámogató; Bőr- és sebápolás; Naptej és UV-védelem; Egyéb
hr-HR: Svrha njege konja: Smirenje i ponašanje; Dlaka i timarenje; Terapija hlađenjem i ledom; Podrška probavi; Zaštita od muha i insekata; Njega kopita; Podrška zglobovima i pokretljivosti; Podrška dišnom sustavu; Njega kože i rana; Krema za sunčanje i UV zaštita; Ostalo
pt-BR: Cuidado com cavalos finalidade: Calmante e comportamento; Pelagem e cuidados; Terapia de resfriamento e gelo; Suporte digestivo; Controle de moscas e insetos; Cuidados com os cascos; Suporte articular e de mobilidade; Suporte respiratório; Cuidados com a pele e feridas; Protetor solar e proteção UV; Outros
fr: Finalité des soins pour cheval: Apaisement et comportement; Robe et pansage; Thérapie par le froid et la glace; Soutien digestif; Protection contre les mouches et les insectes; Soins des sabots; Soutien des articulations et de la mobilité; Soutien respiratoire; Soins de la peau et des plaies; Écran solaire et protection anti-UV; Autre
vi: Mục đích chăm sóc ngựa: Thư giãn & hành vi; Lông & chải chuốt; Liệu pháp làm mát & chườm đá; Hỗ trợ tiêu hóa; Kiểm soát ruồi & côn trùng; Chăm sóc móng; Hỗ trợ khớp & khả năng vận động; Hỗ trợ hô hấp; Chăm sóc da & vết thương; Kem chống nắng & bảo vệ khỏi tia UV; Khác
sk-SK: Slúži na starostlivosť o kone: Upokojenie a správanie; Srsť a starostlivosť; Chladivá a ľadová terapia; Podpora trávenia; Ochrana proti hmyzu; Starostlivosť o kopytá; Podpora kĺbov a pohyblivosti; Podpora dýchania; Starostlivosť o kožu a rany; Opaľovací krém a UV ochrana; Iné
ro-RO: Scopul îngrijirii cailor: Calmare și comportament; Blană și toaletare; Terapie cu răcire și gheață; Sprijin digestiv; Controlul muștelor și insectelor; Îngrijirea copitelor; Susținerea articulațiilor și mobilității; Sprijin respirator; Îngrijirea pielii și rănilor; Protecție solară și UV; Altele
pt-PT: Objectivo do cuidado com os cavalos: Calmante e comportamento; Pelagem e limpeza; Terapia de frio e gelo; Apoio digestivo; Controlo de moscas e insetos; Cuidados com os cascos; Apoio articular e à mobilidade; Apoio respiratório; Cuidados com a pele e feridas; Protetor solar e proteção UV; Outro
ja: 馬のケアの目的: 鎮静・行動ケア; 被毛・グルーミング; 冷却・アイシング療法; 消化サポート; ハエ・害虫対策; 蹄ケア; 関節・可動性サポート; 呼吸器サポート; 皮膚・傷ケア; 日焼け止め・UV 保護; その他
cs: Účel péče o koně: Uklidnění a chování; Péče o srst a čištění; Chladivá a ledovací terapie; Podpora trávení; Ochrana proti hmyzu; Péče o kopyta; Podpora kloubů a pohyblivosti; Podpora dýchacího systému; Péče o kůži a rány; Ochrana proti slunci a UV záření; Jiné
tr: At bakımında kullanım amacı: Sakinleştirme ve davranış; Tüy ve tımarlama; Serinletme ve buz terapisi; Sindirim desteği; Sinek ve böcek kontrolü; Toynak bakımı; Eklem ve hareketlilik desteği; Solunum desteği; Cilt ve yara bakımı; Güneş kremi ve UV koruması; Diğer
de: Zweck der Pferdepflege: Beruhigung und Verhalten; Fell und Pflege; Kühl- und Eistherapie; Verdauungsfördernd; Fliegen- und Insektenschutz; Hufpflege; Unterstützung für Gelenke und Mobilität; Unterstützung der Atemwege; Haut- und Wundpflege; Sonnenschutz und UV-Schutz; Andere
nl: Paardenverzorging doel: Kalmering en gedrag; Vacht en verzorging; Koel- en ijstherapie; Ondersteuning van spijsvertering; Vliegen- en insectenbestrijding; Hoefverzorging; Ondersteuning van gewrichten en mobiliteit; Ondersteuning van luchtwegen; Huid- en wondverzorging; Zonnebrand en uv-bescherming; Overig
ko: 말 관리 목적: 진정 및 행동; 털 및 그루밍; 쿨링 및 아이싱 테라피; 소화 기능 지원; 파리 및 해충 구제; 발굽 관리; 관절 및 이동성 지원; 호흡기 기능 지원; 피부 및 상처 관리; 선스크린 및 자외선 차단; 기타
el: Σκοπός φροντίδας αλόγου: Ηρεμία & συμπεριφορά; Τρίχωμα & περιποίηση; Θεραπεία ψύξης & πάγου; Υποστήριξη πεπτικού; Προστασία από μύγες & έντομα; Φροντίδα οπλών; Υποστήριξη αρθρώσεων & κινητικότητας; Υποστήριξη αναπνευστικού; Φροντίδα δέρματος & πληγών; Αντηλιακό & προστασία UV; Άλλο
bg-BG: Предназначение за грижа за коне: Успокояване и поведение; Козина и груминг; Охлаждане и ледотерапия; Подкрепа на храносмилането; Защита от мухи и насекоми; Грижа за копитата; Подкрепа за ставите и мобилността; Подкрепа на дихателната система; Грижа за кожата и рани; Слънцезащита и UV защита; Друго
th: วัตถุประสงค์ในการดูแลม้า: อารมณ์และพฤติกรรม; บำรุงขนและกรูมมิ่ง; ประคบเย็นและน้ำแข็ง; บำรุงระบบย่อยอาหาร; ควบคุมแมลงวันและแมลง; ดูแลกีบเท้า; บำรุงข้อต่อและการเคลื่อนไหว; บำรุงระบบทางเดินหายใจ; ดูแลผิวหนังและบาดแผล; ครีมกันแดดและป้องกันรังสียูวี; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 馬匹護理用途: 鎮定與行為; 皮毛梳理; 降溫和冰敷治療; 消化保健; 驅蠅與防蟲; 馬蹄護理; 關節與活動力保健; 呼吸道保健; 皮膚與傷口護理; 防曬與抗 UV; 其他
ru: Назначение средств ухода за лошадьми: Успокоение и поведение; Уход за шерстью; Охлаждение и криотерапия; Поддержка пищеварения; Защита от мух и насекомых; Уход за копытами; Поддержка суставов и подвижности; Поддержка дыхательной системы; Уход за кожей и ранами; Солнцезащитные средства и защита от УФ-лучей; Другое
da: Formål med hestepleje: Beroligelse og adfærd; Pels og strigling; Køling og isbehandling; Støtte til fordøjelse; Flue- og insektbeskyttelse; Hovpleje; Støtte til led og mobilitet; Støtte til luftveje; Hud- og sårpleje; Solcreme og UV-beskyttelse; Andet
nb: Formål med hestepleie: Beroligende og atferd; Pels og stell; Kjøle- og isbehandling; Fordøyelsesstøtte; Flue- og insektkontroll; Hovpleie; Ledd- og mobilitetsstøtte; Luftveistøtte; Hud- og sårpleie; Solkrem og UV-beskyttelse; Annet
zh-CN: 马匹护理用途: 镇静与行为; 皮毛与梳理; 降温与冰敷理疗; 消化支持; 防蝇防虫; 马蹄护理; 关节与活动度支持; 呼吸支持; 皮肤与伤口护理; 防晒和防紫外线; 其他
lt-LT: Arklio priežiūros paskirtis: Raminimas ir elgsena; Kailis ir priežiūra; Aušinimo ir ledo terapija; Virškinimo palaikymas; Musių ir vabzdžių kontrolė; Kanopų priežiūra; Sąnarių ir judrumo palaikymas; Kvėpavimo takų palaikymas; Odos ir žaizdų priežiūra; Apsauga nuo saulės ir UV spindulių; Kita